District of Columbia statutes.
38-1202.08

Transfer of functions, personnel, property, assets, and liabilities.

The Board of Higher Education and the Vocational Board shall be abolished on the day that the Board of Trustees convenes its 1st meeting. Except as provided by this unit all functions, powers, and duties of the Board of Higher Education and the Vocational Board under Chapter 11 of this title shall be vested in and exercised by the Trustees. All employees, property (real and personal), and unexpended balances (available or to be made available) of appropriations, allocations, and all other funds and assets and liabilities of the Board of Higher Education and Vocational Board are authorized to be transferred to the Trustees, except the functions of licensing institutions to confer degrees as authorized by this unit. All rules, orders, obligations, determinations and any other understandings of the Board of Higher Education and the Board of Vocational Education shall remain in effect until such time as they may be lawfully amended, modified or repealed by the Trustees.

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1428, Pub. L. 93-471, title II, § 208
as added Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 4, 22 DCR 2929
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(bb), 58 DCR 1720
Transfer of functions from Office of Youth Opportunity Services to School of Continuing Education, Federal City College, University of the District of Columbia, see § 2-1503.
1981 Ed., § 31-1517.
1973 Ed., § 31-1718.
D.C. Law 18-378, in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “this unit” for “§ 29-615”.